Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.580

Public transportation fares—Proof of payment—Civil infractions.

(1) Persons traveling on public transportation operated by a metropolitan municipal corporation or a city-owned transit system shall pay the fare established by the metropolitan municipal corporation or the city-owned transit system and shall produce proof of payment in accordance with the terms of use established by the metropolitan municipal corporation or the city-owned transit system. Such persons shall produce proof of payment when requested by a person designated to monitor fare payment. The required manner of producing proof of payment specified in the terms of use established by the metropolitan municipal corporation or the city-owned transit system may include, but is not limited to, requiring a person using an electronic fare payment card to validate the card by presenting the card to an electronic card reader before or upon entering a public transportation vehicle or a restricted fare paid area.

(2) The following constitute civil infractions punishable according to the schedule of fines and penalties established by a metropolitan municipal corporation or a city-owned transit system under RCW 35.58.585:

(a) Failure to pay the required fare, except when a metropolitan municipal corporation or a city-owned transit system under RCW 35.58.585 fails to meet the requirements of subsection (3) of this section;

(b) Failure to produce proof of payment in the manner required by the terms of use established by the metropolitan municipal corporation or the city-owned transit system including, but not limited to, the failure to produce a validated fare payment card when requested to do so by a person designated to monitor fare payment; and

(c) Failure to depart the bus or other mode of public transportation when requested to do so by a person designated to monitor fare payment.

(3) If fare payment is required before entering a transit vehicle, as defined in RCW 9.91.025(2)(b), or before entering a fare paid area in a transit facility, as defined in RCW 9.91.025(2)(a), signage must be conspicuously posted at the place of boarding or within ten feet of the nearest entrance to a transit facility that clearly indicates: (a) The locations where tickets or fare media may be purchased; and (b) that a person using an electronic fare payment card must present the card to an electronic card reader before entering a transit vehicle or before entering a restricted fare paid area.

[ 2012 c 68 s 1; 2008 c 123 s 1.]